Massachusetts, session 194th, H5063.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Roxbury Division Courthouse of the Boston Municipal Court shall be designated and
known as the Edward O. Gourdin Courthouse, in memory of the late honorable Edward Orval
“Ned” Gourdin for his many contributions to the judiciary, his community and the
commonwealth. The division of capital asset management and maintenance shall erect and
maintain suitable markers bearing the designation in compliance with any applicable standards.
of 1